Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5852XS (2) 91 sc/ns S.F. 2246 Section 1. MILITARY HOME OWNERSHIP ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ââ FY 1 2025-2026 APPROPRIATION. 2 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 3 to the Iowa finance authority for the fiscal year beginning 4 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, 5 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 6 designated: 7 To supplement the appropriation for the continuation of the 8 home ownership assistance program for persons who are or were 9 eligible members of the armed forces of the United States or 10 eligible service members pursuant to section 16.54, as provided 11 in 2025 Iowa Acts, chapter 169, section 1, subsection 3: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 750,000 13 2. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 14 this section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 15 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 16 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 17 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 18 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 19 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 20